District of Columbia statutes.
4-1501.04

Authorization to obtain records.

(a)

The Mayor may obtain criminal history records maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Metropolitan Police Department, and traffic records maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles, to investigate a person applying for employment, in either a compensated position or an unsupervised volunteer position, with any covered child or youth services provider, and to investigate each current employee and unsupervised volunteer serving any covered child or youth services provider.

(b)

Before any applicant for employment with any covered child or youth services provider may be offered a compensated position or an unsupervised volunteer position, the Mayor or the covered child or youth services provider shall inform the applicant that:

(1)

A criminal background check must be conducted on the applicant; and

(2)

In the case of an employee or volunteer who will be required to drive a motor vehicle to transport children in the course of performing his or her duties, a traffic record check must be conducted on the applicant.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 204, 52 DCR 2331
This section is referenced in § 4-1501.03.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 204 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 204 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 204 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 204 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).